District of Columbia statutes.
42-4071

Expired

Conversion

Expired.

Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-131, § 601, 28 DCR 326
1981 Ed., §§ 45-1571, 45-1572.
Expiration of subchapter: Section 907 of D.C. Law 3-131 (codified as former § 45-1597) provided that all subchapters of this chapter, except subchapter V, shall terminate on April 30, 1985.